Illinois, session 104th, HB5370.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.02 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.02)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5-5.02)7    Sec. 5-5.02. Hospital reimbursements. 8    (a) Reimbursement to hospitals; July 1, 1992 through 9September 30, 1992. Notwithstanding any other provisions of 10this Code or the Illinois Department's Rules promulgated under 11the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, reimbursement to 12hospitals for services provided during the period July 1, 1992 13through September 30, 1992, shall be as follows:14        (1) For inpatient hospital services rendered, or if 15    applicable, for inpatient hospital discharges occurring, 16    on or after July 1, 1992 and on or before September 30, 17    1992, the Illinois Department shall reimburse hospitals 18    for inpatient services under the reimbursement 19    methodologies in effect for each hospital, and at the 20    inpatient payment rate calculated for each hospital, as of 21    June 30, 1992. For purposes of this paragraph, 22    "reimbursement methodologies" means all reimbursement 23    methodologies that pertain to the provision of inpatient   HB5370- 2 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1    hospital services, including, but not limited to, any 2    adjustments for disproportionate share, targeted access, 3    critical care access and uncompensated care, as defined by 4    the Illinois Department on June 30, 1992.5        (2) For the purpose of calculating the inpatient 6    payment rate for each hospital eligible to receive 7    quarterly adjustment payments for targeted access and 8    critical care, as defined by the Illinois Department on 9    June 30, 1992, the adjustment payment for the period July 10    1, 1992 through September 30, 1992, shall be 25% of the 11    annual adjustment payments calculated for each eligible 12    hospital, as of June 30, 1992. The Illinois Department 13    shall determine by rule the adjustment payments for 14    targeted access and critical care beginning October 1, 15    1992.16        (3) For the purpose of calculating the inpatient 17    payment rate for each hospital eligible to receive 18    quarterly adjustment payments for uncompensated care, as 19    defined by the Illinois Department on June 30, 1992, the 20    adjustment payment for the period August 1, 1992 through 21    September 30, 1992, shall be one-sixth of the total 22    uncompensated care adjustment payments calculated for each 23    eligible hospital for the uncompensated care rate year, as 24    defined by the Illinois Department, ending on July 31, 25    1992. The Illinois Department shall determine by rule the 26    adjustment payments for uncompensated care beginning   HB5370- 3 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1    October 1, 1992.2    (b) Inpatient payments. For inpatient services provided on 3or after October 1, 1993, in addition to rates paid for 4hospital inpatient services pursuant to the Illinois Health 5Finance Reform Act, as now or hereafter amended, or the 6Illinois Department's prospective reimbursement methodology, 7or any other methodology used by the Illinois Department for 8inpatient services, the Illinois Department shall make 9adjustment payments, in an amount calculated pursuant to the 10methodology described in paragraph (c) of this Section, to 11hospitals that the Illinois Department determines satisfy any 12one of the following requirements:13        (1) Hospitals that are described in Section 1923 of 14    the federal Social Security Act, as now or hereafter 15    amended, except that for rate year 2015 and after a 16    hospital described in Section 1923(b)(1)(B) of the federal 17    Social Security Act and qualified for the payments 18    described in subsection (c) of this Section for rate year 19    2014 provided the hospital continues to meet the 20    description in Section 1923(b)(1)(B) in the current 21    determination year; or22        (2) Illinois hospitals that have a Medicaid inpatient 23    utilization rate which is at least one-half a standard 24    deviation above the mean Medicaid inpatient utilization 25    rate for all hospitals in Illinois receiving Medicaid 26    payments from the Illinois Department; or  HB5370- 4 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1        (3) Illinois hospitals that on July 1, 1991 had a 2    Medicaid inpatient utilization rate, as defined in 3    paragraph (h) of this Section, that was at least the mean 4    Medicaid inpatient utilization rate for all hospitals in 5    Illinois receiving Medicaid payments from the Illinois 6    Department and which were located in a planning area with 7    one-third or fewer excess beds as determined by the Health 8    Facilities and Services Review Board, and that, as of June 9    30, 1992, were located in a federally designated Health 10    Manpower Shortage Area; or11        (4) Illinois hospitals that:12            (A) have a Medicaid inpatient utilization rate 13        that is at least equal to the mean Medicaid inpatient 14        utilization rate for all hospitals in Illinois 15        receiving Medicaid payments from the Department; and16            (B) also have a Medicaid obstetrical inpatient 17        utilization rate that is at least one standard 18        deviation above the mean Medicaid obstetrical 19        inpatient utilization rate for all hospitals in 20        Illinois receiving Medicaid payments from the 21        Department for obstetrical services; or22        (5) Any children's hospital, which means a hospital 23    devoted exclusively to caring for children. A hospital 24    which includes a facility devoted exclusively to caring 25    for children shall be considered a children's hospital to 26    the degree that the hospital's Medicaid care is provided   HB5370- 5 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1    to children if either (i) the facility devoted exclusively 2    to caring for children is separately licensed as a 3    hospital by a municipality prior to February 28, 2013; 4    (ii) the hospital has been designated by the State as a 5    Level III perinatal care facility, has a Medicaid 6    Inpatient Utilization rate greater than 55% for the rate 7    year 2003 disproportionate share determination, and has 8    more than 10,000 qualified children days as defined by the 9    Department in rulemaking; (iii) the hospital has been 10    designated as a Perinatal Level III center by the State as 11    of December 1, 2017, is a Pediatric Critical Care Center 12    designated by the State as of December 1, 2017 and has a 13    2017 Medicaid inpatient utilization rate equal to or 14    greater than 45%; or (iv) the hospital has been designated 15    as a Perinatal Level II center by the State as of December 16    1, 2017, has a 2017 Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate 17    greater than 70%, and has at least 10 pediatric beds as 18    listed on the IDPH 2015 calendar year hospital profile; or19        (6) A hospital that reopens a previously closed 20    hospital facility within 4 calendar years of the hospital 21    facility's closure, if the previously closed hospital 22    facility qualified for payments under paragraph (c) at the 23    time of closure, until utilization data for the new 24    facility is available for the Medicaid inpatient 25    utilization rate calculation. For purposes of this clause, 26    a "closed hospital facility" shall include hospitals that   HB5370- 6 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1    have been terminated from participation in the medical 2    assistance program in accordance with Section 12-4.25 of 3    this Code. 4    (c) Inpatient adjustment payments. The adjustment payments 5required by paragraph (b) shall be calculated based upon the 6hospital's Medicaid inpatient utilization rate as follows:7        (1) hospitals with a Medicaid inpatient utilization 8    rate below the mean shall receive a per day adjustment 9    payment equal to $25;10        (2) hospitals with a Medicaid inpatient utilization 11    rate that is equal to or greater than the mean Medicaid 12    inpatient utilization rate but less than one standard 13    deviation above the mean Medicaid inpatient utilization 14    rate shall receive a per day adjustment payment equal to 15    the sum of $25 plus $1 for each one percent that the 16    hospital's Medicaid inpatient utilization rate exceeds the 17    mean Medicaid inpatient utilization rate;18        (3) hospitals with a Medicaid inpatient utilization 19    rate that is equal to or greater than one standard 20    deviation above the mean Medicaid inpatient utilization 21    rate but less than 1.5 standard deviations above the mean 22    Medicaid inpatient utilization rate shall receive a per 23    day adjustment payment equal to the sum of $40 plus $7 for 24    each one percent that the hospital's Medicaid inpatient 25    utilization rate exceeds one standard deviation above the 26    mean Medicaid inpatient utilization rate;  HB5370- 7 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1        (4) hospitals with a Medicaid inpatient utilization 2    rate that is equal to or greater than 1.5 standard 3    deviations above the mean Medicaid inpatient utilization 4    rate shall receive a per day adjustment payment equal to 5    the sum of $90 plus $2 for each one percent that the 6    hospital's Medicaid inpatient utilization rate exceeds 1.5 7    standard deviations above the mean Medicaid inpatient 8    utilization rate; and9        (5) hospitals qualifying under clause (6) of paragraph 10    (b) shall have the rate assigned to the previously closed 11    hospital facility at the date of closure, until 12    utilization data for the new facility is available for the 13    Medicaid inpatient utilization rate calculation. 14    (c-1) Beginning October 1, 2026, for rate year 2027 and 15thereafter, the Medicaid inpatient utilization rate, as 16defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (h) and used in the 17determination of eligibility for payments under paragraph (c), 18shall be modified to exclude, from both the numerator and 19denominator, all days reimbursed by the Department of Human 20Services for services provided under Section 104-17 of the 21Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 as contracted by the 22Department. 23    (d) Supplemental adjustment payments. In addition to the 24adjustment payments described in paragraph (c), hospitals as 25defined in clauses (1) through (6) of paragraph (b), excluding 26county hospitals (as defined in subsection (c) of Section 15-1   HB5370- 8 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1of this Code) and a hospital organized under the University of 2Illinois Hospital Act, shall be paid supplemental inpatient 3adjustment payments of $60 per day. For purposes of Title XIX 4of the federal Social Security Act, these supplemental 5adjustment payments shall not be classified as adjustment 6payments to disproportionate share hospitals.7    (e) The inpatient adjustment payments described in 8paragraphs (c) and (d) shall be increased on October 1, 1993 9and annually thereafter by a percentage equal to the lesser of 10(i) the increase in the DRI hospital cost index for the most 11recent 12 month period for which data are available, or (ii) 12the percentage increase in the statewide average hospital 13payment rate over the previous year's statewide average 14hospital payment rate. The sum of the inpatient adjustment 15payments under paragraphs (c) and (d) to a hospital, other 16than a county hospital (as defined in subsection (c) of 17Section 15-1 of this Code) or a hospital organized under the 18University of Illinois Hospital Act, however, shall not exceed 19$275 per day; that limit shall be increased on October 1, 1993 20and annually thereafter by a percentage equal to the lesser of 21(i) the increase in the DRI hospital cost index for the most 22recent 12-month period for which data are available or (ii) 23the percentage increase in the statewide average hospital 24payment rate over the previous year's statewide average 25hospital payment rate.26    (f) Children's hospital inpatient adjustment payments. For   HB5370- 9 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1children's hospitals, as defined in clause (5) of paragraph 2(b), the adjustment payments required pursuant to paragraphs 3(c) and (d) shall be multiplied by 2.0.4    (g) County hospital inpatient adjustment payments. For 5county hospitals, as defined in subsection (c) of Section 15-1 6of this Code, there shall be an adjustment payment as 7determined by rules issued by the Illinois Department.8    (h) For the purposes of this Section the following terms 9shall be defined as follows:10        (1) "Medicaid inpatient utilization rate" means a 11    fraction, the numerator of which is the number of a 12    hospital's inpatient days provided in a given 12-month 13    period to patients who, for such days, were eligible for 14    Medicaid under Title XIX of the federal Social Security 15    Act, and the denominator of which is the total number of 16    the hospital's inpatient days in that same period.17        (2) "Mean Medicaid inpatient utilization rate" means 18    the total number of Medicaid inpatient days provided by 19    all Illinois Medicaid-participating hospitals divided by 20    the total number of inpatient days provided by those same 21    hospitals.22        (3) "Medicaid obstetrical inpatient utilization rate" 23    means the ratio of Medicaid obstetrical inpatient days to 24    total Medicaid inpatient days for all Illinois hospitals 25    receiving Medicaid payments from the Illinois Department.26    (i) Inpatient adjustment payment limit. In order to meet   HB5370- 10 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1the limits of Public Law 102-234 and Public Law 103-66, the 2Illinois Department shall by rule adjust disproportionate 3share adjustment payments.4    (j) University of Illinois Hospital inpatient adjustment 5payments. For hospitals organized under the University of 6Illinois Hospital Act, there shall be an adjustment payment as 7determined by rules adopted by the Illinois Department.8    (k) The Illinois Department may by rule establish criteria 9for and develop methodologies for adjustment payments to 10hospitals participating under this Article.11    (l) On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce 12any rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or 13alter any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any 14rate of reimbursement for services or other payments in 15accordance with Section 5-5e. 16    (m) The Department shall establish a cost-based 17reimbursement methodology for determining payments to 18hospitals for approved graduate medical education (GME) 19programs for dates of service on and after July 1, 2018.20        (1) As used in this subsection, "hospitals" means the 21    University of Illinois Hospital as defined in the 22    University of Illinois Hospital Act and a county hospital 23    in a county of over 3,000,000 inhabitants.24        (2) An amendment to the Illinois Title XIX State Plan 25    defining GME shall maximize reimbursement, shall not be 26    limited to the education programs or special patient care   HB5370- 11 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1    payments allowed under Medicare, and shall include:2            (A) inpatient days;3            (B) outpatient days;4            (C) direct costs;5            (D) indirect costs;6            (E) managed care days;7            (F) all stages of medical training and education 8        including students, interns, residents, and fellows 9        with no caps on the number of persons who may qualify; 10        and11            (G) patient care payments related to the 12        complexities of treating Medicaid enrollees including 13        clinical and social determinants of health.14        (3) The Department shall make all GME payments 15    directly to hospitals including such costs in support of 16    clients enrolled in Medicaid managed care entities.17        (4) The Department shall promptly take all actions 18    necessary for reimbursement to be effective for dates of 19    service on and after July 1, 2018 including publishing all 20    appropriate public notices, amendments to the Illinois 21    Title XIX State Plan, and adoption of administrative rules 22    if necessary.23        (5) As used in this subsection, "managed care days" 24    means costs associated with services rendered to enrollees 25    of Medicaid managed care entities. "Medicaid managed care 26    entities" means any entity which contracts with the   HB5370- 12 -LRB104 18661 KTG 32104 b1    Department to provide services paid for on a capitated 2    basis. "Medicaid managed care entities" includes a managed 3    care organization and a managed care community network.4        (6) All payments under this Section are contingent 5    upon federal approval of changes to the Illinois Title XIX 6    State Plan, if that approval is required.7        (7) The Department may adopt rules necessary to 8    implement Public Act 100-581 through the use of emergency 9    rulemaking in accordance with subsection (aa) of Section 10    5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. For 11    purposes of that Act, the General Assembly finds that the 12    adoption of rules to implement Public Act 100-581 is 13    deemed an emergency and necessary for the public interest, 14    safety, and welfare. 15(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-682, eff. 12-10-21; 16102-886, eff. 5-17-22.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.